Hawaii statutes.
§502-72 Disposition of records. Except
as otherwise provided in respect to notaries public by section 456-16, the
books of record so kept shall every five years, and upon the resignation,
death, or removal from office of such judge or other officer, be deposited with
the clerk of the circuit court of the judicial circuit for and in which the
judge or other officer was or is authorized to act. [L 1888, c 18, §2; RL 1925,
§3165; RL 1935, §5151; am L 1941, c 322, §7; RL 1945, §12751; RL 1955, §343-44;
HRS §502-72]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next